North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 6. Medical Assistance Program.
“(b) Initial Report. – No later than March 1, 2022, DHB shall report to the Joint Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice and the Fiscal Research Division on the evaluation required by subsection (a) of this section as it pertains to the implementation of capitated contracts for standard benefit plans for PHPs. The report shall include planned staffing and administrative changes, including any changes to contractual agreements with vendors, to align more appropriately with a managed care delivery environment for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs. The report shall also include a detailed time line for making changes within DHB as managed care continues.

“(c) Final Report. – No later than March 1, 2024, DHB shall report to the Joint Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice and the Fiscal Research Division on the evaluation required by subsection (a) of this section as it pertains to the implementation of capitated contracts for standard benefit plans operated by PHPs and the implementation of BH IDD tailored plans. The report shall include the staffing and administrative changes that have been made since the initial report required under subsection (b) of this section. The report shall also include any additional planned staffing and administrative changes and any planned changes to contractual agreements with vendors to continue to align DHB's functions more appropriately with a managed care delivery environment for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs. The report shall also include an updated detailed time line for making these changes within DHB, as well as an assessment of whether the goals of the time line submitted in the initial report were met.”

Adult and Pediatric Traumatic Brain Injury Pilot Program.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9F.7(a)-(c), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services (DMH/DD/SAS), shall resume the adult and pediatric traumatic brain injury pilot program (TBI pilot program) authorized under Section 11F.9 of S.L. 2017-57, as amended by Section 3.3 of S.L. 2017-212.

“(b) Of the funds appropriated to DMH/DD/SAS in this act, the sum of six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2021-2022 fiscal year to be used to pay the contracted vendor for currently unfunded costs accrued by that vendor's continuation of the TBI pilot program during the 2019-2021 biennium. Of the funds appropriated to DMH/DD/SAS in this act, the sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2021-2022 fiscal year and three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2022-2023 fiscal year shall be used for the TBI pilot program.

“(c) No later than April 1, 2022, DMH/DD/SAS shall submit a report on the TBI pilot program to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division. At a minimum, the report shall include all of the following:

“(1) The number and outcome of patients served at each program site, broken down by patient age and county of origin.

“(2) A breakdown of expenditures at each program site by type of service.

“(3) An estimate of the cost to expand the program incrementally and statewide.

“(4) An estimate of any potential savings of State funds associated with expansion of the program.

“(5) If expansion of the TBI pilot program is recommended, a time line and plan for expanding the program.”

Report on Premium Assistance Within Aids Drug Assistance Program.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9G.3, provides: “Upon a determination by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, that, in six months or less, it will no longer be feasible to operate the health insurance premium assistance program implemented within the North Carolina AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP) on a cost-neutral basis or in a manner that achieves savings to the State, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services notifying the Committee of this determination along with supporting documentation and a proposed course of action with respect to health insurance premium assistance program participants.”

Deploy Child Welfare Component of NC FAST.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9I.15(a)-(c), provides: “(a) Funds transferred from the Medicaid Transformation Reserve and allocated in Section 9B.2 of this act shall be used by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services (Division), to resume deployment of the North Carolina Families Accessing Services through Technology (NC FAST) system as it relates to case management functionality for child welfare. The Division shall deploy the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system statewide before October 1, 2022, as recommended in the Department of Health and Human Services' "Child Welfare Request for Information and Child Welfare Case Management Legislative Report," dated September 14, 2020, and the Program Evaluation Division's Report, "NC FAST Child Welfare Case Management Software Demonstrates Adequate Functionality but Poor Usability," dated June 12, 2020.

“(b) The Division of Social Services (Division) shall release a request for proposal (RFP) for at least one significant augmentation to the child welfare component of the NC FAST system within 30 days from the date the Division receives federal approval of its procurement plan. The Division shall enter into a contract to augment and enhance the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system within 150 days of releasing the RFP. The contract shall align with the recommendations developed by the Executive Advisory Committee within the Department, with consideration given to software currently deployed by county departments of social services.

“(b1) Of the funds allocated in accordance with this section to the Division for the child welfare component of the NC FAST system, the sum of three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium shall be used to ensure that the child welfare case management component of the NC FAST system includes the capability to automate licensing and placements, including external portals for persons applying to be foster care families and for kinship navigator programs, to:

“(1) Increase the number of foster families in North Carolina.

“(2) Expedite the licensing process.

“(3) Assist with meeting the requirements associated with the Family First Prevention Services Act.

“The Division shall release an RFP to automate licensing and placements for the child welfare component of the NC FAST system, enter into a contract for the automation, and ensure that the contract aligns with recommendations developed by the Executive Advisory Committee consistent with the time lines and requirements described in subsection (b) of this section.

“(c) Upon enactment of this section, Part III-N of S.L. 2019-240 is repealed.”